Hawaii statutes.
§23G-18 Sale and distribution. The
session laws, supplements, and replacement volumes shall be sold and
distributed by the lieutenant governor at a price fixed by the lieutenant
governor. The money received therefor shall be paid into the state treasury to
the credit of the general fund. The lieutenant governor may furnish the
session laws, supplements, and replacement volumes to public officials for
official use free of charge. As used in this chapter, public officials include
officials of the state and county governments, of the congressional delegation
of the State, of the United States District Court, District of Hawaii, and of
the United States Attorney's Office in Hawaii. [L Sp 1977 1st, c 8, pt of §1;
am L 1978, c 125, §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next